Nevada, session 83, AB337.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 427A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Division shall establish and administer a program for
dementia care specialists in this State.
2. The program established pursuant to this section must
have as its goals, without limitation:
(a) To develop and provide crisis intervention services for
persons with dementia and their families and caregivers,
including, without limitation, services that provide an initial crisis
response, crisis stabilization and long-term care for persons with
dementia who exhibit behavioral problems.
(b) To proactively support persons with dementia and their
families and caregivers to ensure the highest quality of life
possible and to enable persons with dementia to remain in their
own homes or with family and avoid placement in a facility for
long-term care by, without limitation:
(1) Providing information, assistance, education and
support to persons with dementia and their families and
caregivers;
(2) Facilitating the development of communities in this
State where persons with dementia may remain safe and active;
-
*AB337_R1*

– 3 –
(3) Providing training to governmental agencies and
nonprofit organizations that provide services to persons with
dementia; and
(4) Raising awareness of and developing community
support for persons with dementia and their families and
caregivers.
(c) To assist persons with dementia and their families and
caregivers with limited English proficiency by providing access to
the program through, without limitation, translation and
interpretation services.
3. Within the limits of legislative appropriations and any
other money available for this purpose, the Division shall:
(a) Prepare requests for proposals for the provision of services
by dementia care specialists employed by local governmental
agencies or nonprofit organizations to carry out the program
established pursuant to this section. The Division shall establish
such requirements for the requests for proposals as it determines
necessary.
(b) Partner or contract with an appropriate educational
organization to:
(1) Provide training to dementia care specialists.
(2) Evaluate the program established pursuant to this
section.
4. The Division may adopt regulations necessary to establish
and administer the program established pursuant to this section.
5. As used in this section, “limited English proficiency”
means a person who reads, writes or speaks a language other than
English and who cannot readily understand or communicate in
the English language in written or spoken form, as applicable,
based on the manner in which information is being
communicated.
Sec. 2. Chapter 439 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The University of Nevada, Las Vegas, School of Medicine
and the University of Nevada, Reno, School of Medicine, in
collaboration with the Department, may establish the Nevada
Memory Network in accordance with this section. If the Nevada
Memory Network is established, the University of Nevada, Las
Vegas, School of Medicine, the University of Nevada, Reno,
School of Medicine and the Department shall:
(a) Establish or contract with clinics that employ or contract
with physicians who specialize in neurology, neuropsychology and
geriatrics to:
(1) Train providers of primary care in screening for and
treating dementia;
-
*AB337_R1*

– 4 –
(2) Diagnose dementia in patients referred to the clinics by
providers of primary care;
(3) Create plans of care for patients with dementia; and
(4) Use telehealth where necessary or convenient to carry
out the duties prescribed in subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3).
(b) Employ or contract with community health workers who
specialize in dementia care. The community health workers shall:
(1) Coordinate care and provide referrals to community-
based services and in-home care for patients diagnosed with
dementia pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph (a); and
(2) Monitor the well-being of and provide support to
persons who provide care to patients diagnosed with dementia
pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph (a), including, without
limitation, providers of respite care to such patients.
(c) Contract with community-based organizations to:
(1) Develop and provide crisis intervention services for
persons diagnosed with dementia and their families and
caregivers, including, without limitation, providing initial crisis
response and crisis stabilization services;
(2) Provide long-term care for persons diagnosed with
dementia who exhibit behavioral problems; and
(3) Proactively support persons diagnosed with dementia
and their families and caregivers to ensure the highest quality of
life possible and to enable persons diagnosed with dementia to
remain in their own homes or with family and avoid placement in
a facility for long-term care by, without limitation:
(I) Providing information, assistance, education and
support to persons diagnosed with dementia and their families and
caregivers;
(II) Facilitating the development of communities in this
State where persons diagnosed with dementia may remain safe
and active;
(III) Providing training to governmental agencies and
nonprofit organizations that provide services to persons diagnosed
with dementia; and
(IV) Raising awareness of and developing community
support for persons diagnosed with dementia and their families
and caregivers.
2. The University of Nevada, Las Vegas, School of Medicine,
the University of Nevada, Reno, School of Medicine and the
Department may collaborate or contract with any additional
persons or entities as necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section.
3. As used in this section:
-
*AB337_R1*

– 5 –
(a) “Community health worker” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 449.0027.
(b) “Telehealth” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.515.
Sec. 3. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB337_R1*